Florida, session 2026, HB1017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
144
145 Section 1. Subsection (12) is added to section 648.25,
146 Florida Statutes, to read:
147 648.25 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
148 (12) "Virtual office" means a professional address, mail
149 handling, and sometimes phone answering and meeting room access,
150 without requiring a physical office space.
Page 6 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
151 Section 2. Subsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection
152 (2) of section 648.386, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
153 648.386 Qualifications for prelicensing and continuing
154 education schools and instructors.—
155 (1) DEFINITION OF "IN-PERSON CLASSROOM INSTRUCTION".—As
156 used in this section, the term "in-person classroom instruction"
157 means a course designed to be presented to a group of students
158 by a live instructor using lecture, with the instructor and
159 students in the same physical classroom at the same time video,
160 webcast, or virtual or other audio-video presentation.
161 (2) SCHOOLS AND CURRICULUM FOR PRELICENSING SCHOOLS.—In
162 order to be considered for approval and certification as an
163 approved limited surety agent and professional bail bond agent
164 prelicensing school, such entity must:
165 (a)1. Offer a minimum of two 80-hour in-person 120-hour
166 classroom-instruction basic certification courses in the
167 criminal justice system per calendar year unless a reduced
168 number of course offerings per calendar year is warranted in
169 accordance with rules adopted promulgated by the department; or
170 2. Offer a department-approved correspondence course
171 pursuant to department rules.
172 Section 3. Paragraphs (d) through (p) of subsection (1) of
173 section 648.44, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs
174 (e) through (q), respectively, present paragraph (j) of
175 subsection (1) and subsections (4) and (9) are amended, and a
Page 7 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
176 new paragraph (d) is added to subsection (1) of that section, to
177 read:
178 648.44 Prohibitions; penalty.—
179 (1) A bail bond agent or bail bond agency may not:
180 (d) Solicit bail from a detainee, the detainee's attorney,
181 an adult member of the detainee's immediate family, or any other
182 person the detainee specifically designates in writing. The
183 detainee must sign this designation before the solicitation
184 unless prohibited by the rules, regulations, or ordinances
185 governing the place of imprisonment. If such a prohibition
186 exists, the designation may be signed after the detainee's
187 release to ratify a previous oral designation made by him or
188 her. A solicitation to a detainee may occur only after a
189 legitimate request for bail services has been received from the
190 detainee or an individual specified in this paragraph. The
191 solicitation of a person specified in this paragraph may only
192 occur between 8 a.m. and 9 p.m., unless the bail bond agent or
193 bail bond agency has received direct and specific written
194 authorization from the detainee or the detainee's attorney to
195 solicit at another time.
196 (k)(j) Accept anything of value from a principal for
197 providing a bail bond aside from except the premium, a credit
198 card merchant processing fee, a mobile payment services fee or
199 similar charge which must be separate from and not considered
200 premium, and a transfer fee authorized by the office, except
Page 8 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
201 that the bail bond agent or bail bond agency may accept
202 collateral security or other indemnity from the principal or
203 another person in accordance with s. 648.442, together with
204 documentary stamp taxes, if applicable. No fees, expenses, or
205 charges of any kind shall be permitted to be deducted from the
206 collateral held or any return premium due, except as authorized
207 by this chapter or rule of the department or commission. Upon
208 written agreement with another party, a bail bond agent or bail
209 bond agency may, upon written agreement with another party,
210 receive a fee or compensation for returning to custody an
211 individual who has fled the jurisdiction of the court or caused
212 the forfeiture of a bond.
213 (4) A place of business, including a branch office, may
214 not be established, opened, or maintained unless it is under the
215 active full-time charge of a licensed and appointed bail bond
216 agent. A virtual office is prohibited.
217 (9)(a) A Any person who violates paragraph (1)(f),
218 paragraph (1)(g), paragraph (1)(h), paragraph (1)(k), paragraph
219 (1)(o), any provisions of paragraph (1)(e), paragraph (1)(f),
220 paragraph (1)(g), paragraph (1)(j), or paragraph (1)(n), or
221 subsection (2) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable
222 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.
223 (b) A Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph
224 (1)(a), paragraph (1)(b), paragraph (1)(c), paragraph (1)(i),
225 paragraph (1)(l), paragraph (1)(n), paragraph (1)(p), paragraph
Page 9 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
226 (1)(q), paragraph (1)(h), paragraph (1)(k), paragraph (1)(m),
227 paragraph (1)(o), paragraph (1)(p), subsection (3), subsection
228 (4), or subsection (5) commits a misdemeanor of the first
229 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
230 Section 4. Subsection (2) of section 903.011, Florida
231 Statutes, is amended to read:
232 903.011 Pretrial release; general terms; statewide uniform
233 bond schedule.—
234 (2) Any monetary or cash component of any form of pretrial
235 release must may be met by a surety bond or by United States
236 currency, a United States postal money order, or a cashier's
237 check in the amount of the bond.
238 Section 5. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
239 903.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
240 903.046 Purpose of and criteria for bail determination.—
241 (2) When determining whether to release a defendant on
242 bail or other conditions, and what that bail or those conditions
243 may be, the court shall consider:
244 (d) The defendant's past and present conduct, including
245 any record of convictions, previous flight to avoid prosecution,
246 or failure to appear at court proceedings. However, any
247 defendant who had failed to appear on the day of any required
248 court proceeding in the case at issue, but who had later
249 voluntarily appeared or surrendered, is not shall not be
250 eligible for a recognizance bond; and any defendant who failed
Page 10 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
251 to appear on the day of any required court proceeding in the
252 case at issue and who was later arrested is not shall not be
253 eligible for a recognizance bond or for any form of bond which
254 does not require the greater of a monetary undertaking or
255 commitment equal to or greater than $2,000 or twice the value of
256 the monetary commitment or undertaking of the original bond,
257 whichever is greater. Notwithstanding anything in this section,
258 the court has discretion in determining conditions of release if
259 the defendant proves circumstances beyond his or her control for
260 the failure to appear. This section may not be construed as
261 imposing additional duties or obligations on a governmental
262 entity related to monetary bonds.
263 Section 6. Section 903.0471, Florida Statutes, is amended
264 to read:
265 903.0471 Violation of condition of pretrial release.—
266 Notwithstanding s. 907.041, a court may, on its own motion,
267 revoke pretrial release and order pretrial detention if the
268 court finds probable cause to believe that the defendant
269 committed a new crime while on pretrial release or violated any
270 other condition of pretrial release in a material respect. Upon
271 entry of such an order to revoke pretrial release and order
272 pretrial detention, other than for a failure to appear, the
273 clerk of the court must discharge any bond previously posted as
274 a condition of pretrial release without further order of the
275 court.
Page 11 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
276 Section 7. Section 903.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to
277 read:
278 903.05 Qualification of sureties.—A surety for the release
279 of a person on bail, other than a company authorized by law to
280 act as a surety, shall be a resident of the state or own real
281 estate within the state.
282 Section 8. Section 903.08, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
283 Section 9. Subsection (1) of section 903.09, Florida
284 Statutes, is amended to read:
285 903.09 Justification of sureties.—
286 (1) A surety, other than a bail bond agent as defined in
287 s. 648.25, shall justify his or her suretyship by attaching to
288 the bond United States currency, a United States postal money
289 order, or a cashier's check in the amount of the bond; however,
290 the United States currency, United States postal money order, or
291 cashier's check may not be used to secure more than one bond
292 execute an affidavit stating that she or he possesses the
293 qualifications and net worth required to become a surety. The
294 affidavit shall describe the surety's property and any
295 encumbrances and shall state the number and amount of any bonds
296 entered into by the surety at any court that remain
297 undischarged.
298 Section 10. Section 903.101, Florida Statutes, is amended
299 to read:
300 903.101 Sureties; licensed persons; to have equal access.—
Page 12 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
301 Subject to rules adopted by the Department of Financial Services
302 and by the Financial Services Commission, every surety who meets
303 the requirements of s. 903.09 ss. 903.05, 903.06, 903.08, and
304 903.09, and every person who is currently licensed by the
305 Department of Financial Services and registered as required by
306 s. 648.42 must shall have equal access to the jails of this
307 state for the purpose of making bonds.
308 Section 11. Section 903.16, Florida Statutes, is amended
309 to read:
310 903.16 Deposit of money or bonds as bail.—
311 (1) A defendant who has been admitted to bail, or another
312 person in the defendant's behalf, may deposit with the official
313 authorized to take bail money an amount equal to the bail amount
314 set in the court order. Such deposit must be receipted in the
315 name of the defendant or nonregistered bonds of the United
316 States, the state, or a city, town, or county in the state,
317 equal in market value to the amount set in the order and the
318 personal bond of the defendant and an undertaking by the
319 depositor if the money or bonds are deposited by another. The
320 sheriff or other officials shall may remit money or bonds
321 received to the clerk to be held by the clerk pending court
322 action or return to the defendant or depositor. The clerk shall
323 accept money or bonds remitted by the sheriff.
324 (2) Consent is conclusively presumed for the clerk of the
325 circuit court to sell bonds deposited as bail after forfeiture
Page 13 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
326 of the bond.
327 Section 12. Section 903.17, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
328 Section 13. Subsection (3) of section 903.21, Florida
329 Statutes, is amended to read:
330 903.21 Method of surrender; exoneration of obligors.—
331 (3)(a) The surety shall be exonerated of liability on the
332 bond if it is determined before forfeiture breach of the bond
333 that the defendant is in any jail or prison and the surety
334 agrees in writing to pay the costs and expenses incurred in
335 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court. A
336 surety is only responsible for the itemized costs and expenses
337 incurred for the transport of a defendant to whom he or she has
338 a fiduciary duty and is not liable for the costs and expenses
339 incurred in transporting any other defendant.
340 (b) As used in For purposes of this subsection, the term:
341 1. "Costs and expenses" means the prorated salary of any
342 law enforcement officer or employee of a contracted
343 transportation company as well as the actual expenses of
344 transporting each defendant, which may only consist of mileage,
345 vehicle expenses, meals, and, if necessary, overnight lodging
346 for any law enforcement officer or employee of a contracted
347 transportation company and the defendant.
348 2. "Jurisdiction" means the county from which the
349 defendant was released on bail.
350 Section 14. Section 903.26, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 14 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
351 to read:
352 903.26 Forfeiture of the bond; when and how directed;
353 discharge; how and when made; effect of payment.—
354 (1) A bail bond may shall not be forfeited unless:
355 (a) The information, indictment, or affidavit was filed
356 within 6 months after from the date of arrest, and
357 (b) The clerk of the court gave the surety at least 72
358 hours' notice, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
359 before the time of the required appearance of the defendant.
360 Notice is shall not be necessary if the time for appearance is
361 within 72 hours after from the time of arrest, or if the time is
362 stated on the bond. Such notice may be mailed or electronically
363 transmitted. A certificate signed by the clerk of the court or
364 the clerk's designee which certifies that the notice required
365 under this paragraph was mailed or electronically transmitted on
366 a specified date and time and which is accompanied by a copy of
367 the required notice constitutes sufficient proof that such
368 mailing or electronic transmission was properly accomplished as
369 required in this paragraph.
370 (2)(a) If there is a failure of the defendant to appear as
371 required, the court must shall declare the bond and any bonds or
372 money deposited as bail forfeited. The clerk of the court shall
373 mail or electronically transmit a notice to the surety agent,
374 bail bond agency, and surety company within 5 days after the
375 forfeiture. A certificate signed by the clerk of the court or
Page 15 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
376 the clerk's designee which certifies, certifying that the notice
377 required under this section herein was mailed or electronically
378 transmitted on a specified date and which is accompanied by a
379 copy of the required notice constitutes, shall constitute
380 sufficient proof that such mailing or electronic transmission
381 was properly accomplished as required in this paragraph
382 indicated therein. If such mailing or electronic transmission
383 was properly accomplished as evidenced by such certificate, the
384 failure of the surety agent, a bail bond agency, of a company,
385 or of a defendant to receive such notice does shall not
386 constitute a defense to such forfeiture and may shall not be
387 grounds for discharge, remission, reduction, set aside, or
388 continuance of such forfeiture. The forfeiture must shall be
389 paid within 60 days after the date the notice was mailed or
390 electronically transmitted.
391 (b) If Failure of the defendant fails to appear at the
392 time, date, and place of required appearance, shall result in
393 forfeiture of the bond is forfeited. Such forfeiture must shall
394 be automatically entered by the clerk upon such failure to
395 appear, and the clerk shall follow the procedures in paragraph
396 (a). However, the court may determine, in its discretion and, in
397 the interest of justice, that an appearance by the defendant on
398 the same day as required day does not warrant forfeiture of the
399 bond; and the court may direct the clerk to set aside any such
400 forfeiture which may have been entered. Any appearance by the
Page 16 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
401 defendant later than the required day constitutes forfeiture of
402 the bond, and the court may shall not preclude entry of such
403 forfeiture by the clerk.
404 (c) If there is a forfeiture of the bond, the clerk must
405 shall provide, upon request, a certified copy of the warrant or
406 capias to the bail bond agent or surety company.
407 (3) Sixty days after the forfeiture notice has been mailed
408 or electronically transmitted:
409 (a) State and county officials having custody of forfeited
410 money shall deposit the money in the fine and forfeiture fund
411 established pursuant to s. 142.01.
412 (b) Municipal officials having custody of forfeited money
413 shall deposit the money in a designated municipal fund.
414 (b)(c) Officials having custody of bonds as authorized by
415 s. 903.16 shall transmit the bonds to the clerk of the circuit
416 court who shall sell them at market value and disburse the
417 proceeds as provided in paragraph (a) paragraphs (a) and (b).
418 (4)(a) When a bond is forfeited, the clerk shall transmit
419 the bond and any affidavits to the clerk of the circuit court in
420 which the bond and affidavits are filed. The clerk of the
421 circuit court shall record the forfeiture in the deed or
422 official records book. If the undertakings and affidavits
423 describe real property in another county, the clerk shall
424 transmit the bond and affidavits to the clerk of the circuit
425 court of the county where the property is located who shall
Page 17 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
426 record and return them.
427 (b) The bond and affidavits shall be a lien on the real
428 property they describe from the time of recording in the county
429 where the property is located for 2 years or until the final
430 determination of an action instituted thereon within a 2-year
431 period. If an action is not instituted within 2 years from the
432 date of recording, the lien shall be discharged. The lien will
433 be discharged 2 years after the recording even if an action was
434 instituted within 2 years unless a lis pendens notice is
435 recorded in the action.
436 (4)(5) The court shall discharge a forfeiture within 60
437 days after the forfeiture notice was mailed or electronically
438 transmitted upon any of the following:
439 (a) A determination that, due to circumstances beyond the
440 defendant's control, it was impossible for the defendant to
441 appear as required or within 60 days after the date of the
442 required appearance due to circumstances beyond the defendant's
443 control. The potential adverse economic consequences of
444 appearing as required may not be considered as constituting a
445 ground for such a determination.;
446 (b) A determination that, at the time of the required
447 appearance or within 60 days after the date of the required
448 appearance, the defendant was confined in an institution or
449 hospital; was confined in any county, state, federal, or
450 immigration detention facility; was deported; or is deceased.;
Page 18 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
451 (c) Surrender or arrest of the defendant at the time of
452 the required appearance or within 60 days after the date of the
453 required appearance in any county, state, or federal jail or
454 prison and upon a hold being placed to return the defendant to
455 the jurisdiction of the court. The court shall condition a
456 discharge or remission on the payment of costs and the expenses
457 as provided in s. 903.21(3), incurred by an official in
458 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court.; or
459 (d) A determination that the state is unwilling to seek
460 extradition of the fugitive defendant within 10 30 days after a
461 written request by the surety agent to do so, and contingent
462 upon the surety agent's consent to pay all costs and the
463 expenses incurred by an official in returning the defendant to
464 the jurisdiction of the court, as provided in s. 903.21(3), up
465 to the penal amount of the bond.
466 (5) For each felony warrant that a court issues for a
467 failure to appear in court, the state shall enter the
468 information of the defendant in the National Crime Information
469 Center database with no restrictions until the defendant is
470 returned to the jurisdiction of the court.
471 (6) The discharge of a forfeiture may shall not be ordered
472 for any reason other than as specified herein.
473 (7) The payment by a surety of a forfeiture under this law
474 has shall have the same effect on the bond as payment of a
475 judgment.
Page 19 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
476 (8) If the defendant is arrested and returned to the
477 county of jurisdiction of the court or has posted a new bond for
478 the case at issue before judgment, the clerk must, upon
479 affirmation by the sheriff or the chief correctional officer
480 and, shall, without further hearing or order of the court,
481 discharge the forfeiture of the bond. However, if the surety
482 agent fails to pay the costs and expenses incurred in returning
483 the defendant to the county of jurisdiction, the clerk may shall
484 not discharge the forfeiture of the bond. If the surety agent
485 and the sheriff fail to agree on the amount of such said costs,
486 then the court, after notice to the sheriff and the state
487 attorney, must shall determine the amount of the costs.
488 (9) If, after forfeiture of a bond, the criminal charges
489 for which the bond guaranteed appearance are resolved,
490 adjudicated, or otherwise disposed of by any action of the court
491 or state, the clerk must discharge the forfeiture and issue such
492 notice to the surety without further order of the court. If such
493 resolution or disposition occurs after payment of a forfeiture
494 or judgment, remission must be granted upon proper motion and as
495 specified under s. 903.28.
496 (10) Unless the time for payment or discharge of the
497 forfeiture set forth in s. 903.27(1) has passed, or unless
498 payment of the forfeiture has already been made, the clerk does
499 not have standing to object to a motion to set aside a
500 forfeiture under paragraph (2)(b), a motion to discharge a
Page 20 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
501 forfeiture under subsection (4), or a motion to reinstate a bond
502 under s. 903.31(2).
503 Section 15. Section 903.27, Florida Statutes, is amended
504 to read:
505 903.27 Forfeiture to judgment.—
506 (1) If the forfeiture is not paid or discharged by order
507 of a court of competent jurisdiction within 60 days after the
508 forfeiture notice has been mailed or electronically transmitted
509 and the bond is secured other than by money and bonds authorized
510 in s. 903.16, the clerk of the circuit court for the county
511 where the order was made must shall enter a judgment against the
512 surety for the amount of the penalty and issue execution.
513 However, in any case in which the bond forfeiture has been
514 discharged by the court of competent jurisdiction conditioned
515 upon the payment by the surety of certain costs or fees as
516 allowed by statute, the amount for which judgment may be entered
517 may not exceed the amount of the unpaid fees or costs upon which
518 the discharge had been conditioned. Judgment for the full amount
519 of the forfeiture may shall not be entered if payment of a
520 lesser amount will satisfy the conditions to discharge the
521 forfeiture. Within 5 10 days, the clerk shall furnish the
522 Department of Financial Services and the Office of Insurance
523 Regulation of the Financial Services Commission with a certified
524 copy of the judgment docket and shall furnish the surety company
525 at its home office a copy of the judgment, which shall include
Page 21 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
526 the power of attorney number of the bond and the name of the
527 executing agent. If the judgment is not paid within 35 days, the
528 clerk must shall furnish the Department of Financial Services,
529 the Office of Insurance Regulation, and the sheriff of the
530 county in which the bond was executed, or the official
531 responsible for operation of the county jail, if that official
532 is not other than the sheriff, two copies of the judgment and a
533 certificate stating that the judgment remains unsatisfied. When
534 and if the judgment is properly paid or an order to vacate the
535 judgment has been entered by a court of competent jurisdiction,
536 the clerk shall immediately notify the sheriff, or other such
537 the official responsible for the operation of the county jail,
538 if other than the sheriff, and, if they have been previously
539 notified of nonpayment, the Department of Financial Services and
540 the Office of Insurance Regulation, if the department and office
541 had been previously notified of nonpayment, of such payment or
542 order to vacate the judgment. The clerk may furnish documents or
543 give notice as required in this subsection by mail or electronic
544 means. The clerk shall also immediately prepare and record in
545 the public records a satisfaction of the judgment or record the
546 order to vacate judgment. If the defendant is returned to the
547 county of jurisdiction of the court, whenever a motion to set
548 aside the judgment is filed, the operation of this section is
549 tolled until the court makes a disposition of the motion.
550 (2) A certificate signed by the clerk of the court or her
Page 22 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
551 or his designee which certifies, certifying that the notice
552 required in subsection (1) was mailed or electronically
553 delivered on a specified date, and is accompanied by a copy of
554 the required notice constitutes sufficient proof that such
555 mailing or electronic delivery was properly accomplished as
556 required in this subsection indicated therein. If such mailing
557 or electronic delivery was properly accomplished as evidenced by
558 such certificate, the failure of a company to receive a copy of
559 the judgment as prescribed in subsection (1) does not constitute
560 a defense to the forfeiture and is not a ground for the
561 discharge, remission, reduction, set aside, or continuance of
562 such forfeiture.
563 (3) Surety bail bonds may not be executed by a bail bond
564 agent or a bail bond agency against whom a judgment has been
565 entered which has remained unpaid for 35 days and may not be
566 executed for a company against whom a judgment has been entered
567 which has remained unpaid for 50 days. A No sheriff or other
568 official who is empowered to accept or approve surety bail bonds
569 may not shall accept or approve such a bond executed by such a
570 bail bond agent or bail bond agency or executed for such a
571 company until such judgment has been paid.
572 (4) After notice of judgment against the surety given by
573 the clerk of the circuit court, the surety, a bail bond agency,
574 or a bail bond agent shall, within 35 days after of the entry of
575 judgment, submit to the clerk of the circuit court an amount
Page 23 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
576 equal to the judgment, unless the judgment has been set aside by
577 the court within 35 days after of the entry of the judgment. If
578 a motion to set aside the judgment has been filed pursuant to
579 subsection (5), the amount submitted must shall be held in
580 escrow until such time as the court has disposed of the motion.
581 The failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection
582 constitutes a failure to pay the judgment.
583 (5) After notice of judgment against the surety given by
584 the clerk of the circuit court, the surety, bail bond agency, or
585 bail bond agent may within 35 days file a motion to set aside
586 the judgment or to stay the judgment. It shall be a condition of
587 Any such motion or and of any order to stay the judgment must be
588 conditioned on payment by that the surety of pay the amount of
589 the judgment to the clerk, which amount must shall be held in
590 escrow until such time as the court has disposed of the motion
591 to set aside the judgment. The filing of such a motion, when
592 accompanied by the required escrow deposit, acts shall act as an
593 automatic stay of further proceedings, including execution,
594 until the motion has been heard and a decision rendered by the
595 court.
596 (6) The failure of a state attorney to file, or of the
597 clerk of the circuit court to make, a certified copy of the
598 order of forfeiture as required by law applicable before prior
599 to July 1, 1982, does shall not invalidate any judgment entered
600 by the clerk before prior to June 12, 1981.
Page 24 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
601 Section 16. Section 903.28, Florida Statutes, is amended
602 to read:
603 903.28 Remission of forfeiture; conditions.—
604 (1) On application within 36 months after 2 years from
605 forfeiture, the court must shall order remission of the
606 forfeiture in accordance with subsection (2) if it determines
607 that there was no breach of the bond.
608 (2) If the defendant surrenders or is apprehended and the
609 surety has paid all costs of returning the defendant to the
610 jurisdiction of the court, if the defendant is deceased, or if
611 the state attorney is unwilling to seek extradition of the
612 defendant from any jail or prison after a request by the surety
613 agent, bail bond agency, or surety company consenting to pay all
614 costs incurred by an official in returning the defendant to the
615 jurisdiction of the court, as provided in s. 903.21(3)(a), up to
616 the penal amount of the bond, within 36 months 90 days after
617 forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing upon notice having
618 been given to the clerk of the circuit court and the state
619 attorney as required in subsection (4), must subsection (8),
620 shall direct remission in accordance with the following:
621 (a) One-hundred percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
622 surrenders or is apprehended within 90 days after the forfeiture
623 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
624 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
625 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 90 days
Page 25 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
626 after forfeiture.
627 (b) Ninety-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
628 surrenders or is apprehended within 180 days after forfeiture
629 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
630 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
631 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 180 days
632 after forfeiture.
633 (c) Ninety percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
634 surrenders or is apprehended within 270 days after forfeiture
635 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
636 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
637 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 270 days
638 after forfeiture.
639 (d) Eighty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
640 surrenders or is apprehended within 360 days after forfeiture
641 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
642 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
643 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 360 days
644 after forfeiture.
645 (e) Eighty percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
646 surrenders or is apprehended within 450 days after forfeiture
647 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
648 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
649 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 450 days
650 after forfeiture.
Page 26 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
651 (f) Seventy-five percent of the forfeiture if the
652 defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 540 days after
653 forfeiture and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of
654 the defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
655 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 540 days
656 after forfeiture.
657 (g) Seventy percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
658 surrenders or is apprehended within 630 days after forfeiture
659 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
660 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
661 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 630 days
662 after forfeiture.
663 (h) Sixty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
664 surrenders or is apprehended within 720 days after forfeiture
665 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
666 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
667 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 720 days
668 after forfeiture.
669 (i) Sixty percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
670 surrenders or is apprehended within 810 days after forfeiture
671 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
672 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
673 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 810 days
674 after forfeiture.
675 (j) Fifty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
Page 27 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
676 surrenders or is apprehended within 900 days after forfeiture
677 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
678 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
679 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 900 days
680 after forfeiture.
681 (k) Fifty percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
682 surrenders or is apprehended within 990 days after forfeiture
683 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
684 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
685 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 990 days
686 after forfeiture.
687 (l) Forty-five percent of the forfeiture if the defendant
688 surrenders or is apprehended within 36 months after forfeiture
689 and the delay has not thwarted proper prosecution of the
690 defendant or if the defendant is deceased or the state is
691 unwilling to seek extradition of the defendant within 36 months
692 after forfeiture of up to, but not more than, 100 percent of a
693 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the
694 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant
695 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the
696 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the
697 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has
698 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In
699 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not
700 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the
Page 28 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
701 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of
702 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have
703 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not
704 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant.
705 (3) If the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within
706 180 days after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing
707 upon notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court
708 and the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall
709 direct remission of up to, but not more than, 95 percent of a
710 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the
711 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant
712 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the
713 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the
714 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has
715 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In
716 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not
717 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the
718 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of
719 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have
720 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not
721 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant.
722 (4) If the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within
723 270 days after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing
724 upon notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court
725 and the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall
Page 29 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
726 direct remission of up to, but not more than, 90 percent of a
727 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the
728 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant
729 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the
730 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the
731 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has
732 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In
733 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not
734 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the
735 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of
736 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have
737 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not
738 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant.
739 (5) If the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 1
740 year after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing upon
741 notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court and
742 the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall direct
743 remission of up to, but not more than, 85 percent of a
744 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the
745 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant
746 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the
747 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the
748 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has
749 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In
750 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not
Page 30 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
751 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the
752 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of
753 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have
754 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not
755 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant.
756 (6) If the defendant surrenders or is apprehended within 2
757 years after forfeiture, the court, on motion at a hearing upon
758 notice having been given to the clerk of the circuit court and
759 the state attorney as required in subsection (8), shall direct
760 remission of up to, but not more than, 50 percent of a
761 forfeiture if the surety apprehended and surrendered the
762 defendant or if the apprehension or surrender of the defendant
763 was substantially procured or caused by the surety, or the
764 surety has substantially attempted to procure or cause the
765 apprehension or surrender of the defendant, and the delay has
766 not thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant. In
767 addition, remission shall be granted when the surety did not
768 substantially participate or attempt to participate in the
769 apprehension or surrender of the defendant when the costs of
770 returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have
771 been deducted from the remission and when the delay has not
772 thwarted the proper prosecution of the defendant.
773 (3)(7) The remission of a forfeiture may not be ordered
774 for any reason other than as specified in this section herein.
775 (4)(8) An application for remission must be accompanied by
Page 31 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
776 affidavits setting forth the facts on which it is founded;
777 however, the surety must establish by further documentation or
778 other evidence any claimed attempt at procuring or causing the
779 apprehension or surrender of the defendant before the court may
780 order remission based upon an attempt to procure or cause such
781 apprehension or surrender. The clerk of the circuit court and
782 the state attorney must be given 10 20 days' notice before a
783 hearing on an application and be furnished copies of all papers,
784 applications, and affidavits. Remission must shall be granted on
785 the condition of payment of costs, as provided in s.
786 903.21(3)(a), unless the ground for remission is that there was
787 no breach of the bond.
788 (5)(9) The clerk of the circuit court may enter into a
789 contract with a private attorney or into an interagency
790 agreement with a governmental agency to represent the clerk of
791 the court in an action for the remission of a forfeiture under
792 this section.
793 (6)(10) The clerk of the circuit court is the real party
794 in interest for all appeals arising from an action for the
795 remission of a forfeiture under this section.
796 (7) The clerk of the circuit court shall issue a remission
797 within 10 days after entry of a court order directing remission,
798 and a remission untimely issued accrues interest at the rate of
799 1.5 percent per month.
800 (8) If the defendant surrenders or is apprehended and the
Page 32 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
801 surety has not paid all costs of returning the defendant to the
802 jurisdiction of court, the court may order remission of the
803 forfeiture in accordance with subsection (2) if the actual costs
804 of returning the defendant to the jurisdiction of the court have
805 been deducted from the remission.
806 Section 17. Section 903.29, Florida Statutes, is amended
807 to read:
808 903.29 Arrest of principal by surety after forfeiture.—
809 Within 3 2 years from the date of forfeiture of a bond, the
810 surety may arrest the principal for the purpose of surrendering
811 the principal to the official in whose custody she or he was at
812 the time bail was taken or in whose custody the principal would
813 have been placed had she or he been committed.
814 Section 18. Subsections (1) and (2) of section 903.31,
815 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
816 903.31 Canceling the bond.—
817 (1) Within 10 business days after the conditions of a bond
818 have been satisfied or the forfeiture discharged or remitted,
819 the court must shall order the bond canceled and, if the surety
820 has attached a certificate of cancellation to the original bond,
821 the clerk of the court must shall mail or electronically furnish
822 an executed certificate of cancellation to the surety without
823 cost. The clerk of the court shall discharge the bond upon an
824 adjudication of guilt or innocence or an acquittal, or if a
825 period of 36 months has passed since the original bond was
Page 33 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
826 posted., or A withholding of an adjudication of guilt, a finding
827 of guilt by a jury, or a no action by the state satisfies shall
828 satisfy the conditions of the bond. If the bond has been revoked
829 by the court, other than for a failure to appear, the clerk of
830 the court must discharge or cancel the bond. The original
831 appearance bond expires shall expire 36 months after such bond
832 has been posted for the release of the defendant from custody,
833 at which time the clerk of the court must discharge the bond.
834 This subsection does not apply to cases in which a bond has been
835 declared forfeited before the 36-month expiration, unless the
836 forfeiture was set aside or discharged. As used in this
837 subsection, the term "revoked" means that an act, a statement, a
838 document, or a promise has been annulled or canceled.
839 (2) The original appearance bond does not guarantee a
840 deferred sentence; a sentencing deferral; a delayed sentencing;
841 an appearance after entering a plea agreement; an appearance
842 during or after a presentence investigation; an appearance
843 during or after appeals; conduct during or appearance after
844 admission to a pretrial intervention program; placement in a
845 court-ordered program, including a residential mental health
846 facility; payment of fines; or attendance at educational or
847 rehabilitation facilities the court otherwise provides in the
848 judgment. If the original appearance bond has been forfeited or
849 revoked, it may the bond shall not be reinstated without
850 approval from the surety on the original bond.
Page 34 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
851 Section 19. Section 903.36, Florida Statutes, is repealed.
852 Section 20. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) and paragraphs
853 (a) and (d) of subsection (5) of section 907.041, Florida
854 Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (c) of subsection (5) of
855 that section is reenacted, to read:
856 907.041 Pretrial detention and release.—
857 (3) RELEASE ON NONMONETARY CONDITIONS.—
858 (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to create a
859 presumption in favor of release on nonmonetary conditions for
860 any person who is granted pretrial release unless such person is
861 charged with a dangerous crime as defined in subsection (5) or
862 such person is an unauthorized alien charged with a forcible
863 felony as described in subsection (6). A person charged with a
864 dangerous crime as defined in subsection (5) shall be released
865 on monetary conditions, with a minimum bond amount of $10,000
866 per offense for each felony crime listed in subsection (5) if it
867 is determined that such monetary conditions are necessary to
868 assure the presence of the person at trial or at other
869 proceedings, to protect the community from risk of physical harm
870 to persons, to assure the presence of the accused at trial, or
871 to assure the integrity of the judicial process.
872 (b) A No person may not shall be released on nonmonetary
873 conditions under the supervision of a pretrial release service,
874 unless the service certifies in writing to the court, before the
875 defendant is released from custody, that it has investigated or
Page 35 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
876 otherwise verified:
877 1. The circumstances of the accused's family, employment,
878 financial resources, character, mental condition, immigration
879 status, and length of residence in the community;
880 2. The accused's record of convictions, of appearances at
881 court proceedings, of flight to avoid prosecution, or of failure
882 to appear at court proceedings; and
883 3. Other facts necessary to assist the court in its
884 determination of the indigency of the accused and whether she or
885 he should be released under the supervision of the service.
886 (5) PRETRIAL DETENTION.—
887 (a) As used in this subsection, "dangerous crime" means
888 any of the following:
889 1. Arson.;
890 2. Aggravated assault.;
891 3. Aggravated battery.;
892 4. Illegal use of explosives.;
893 5. Child abuse or aggravated child abuse.;
894 6. Abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult, or
895 aggravated abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult.;
896 7. Aircraft piracy.;
897 8. Kidnapping.;
898 9. Homicide.;
899 10. Manslaughter, including DUI manslaughter and BUI
900 manslaughter.;
Page 36 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
901 11. Sexual battery.;
902 12. Robbery.;
903 13. Carjacking.;
904 14. Lewd, lascivious, or indecent assault or act upon or
905 in presence of a child under the age of 16 years.;
906 15. Sexual activity with a child, who is 12 years of age
907 or older but less than 18 years of age, by or at solicitation of
908 person in familial or custodial authority.;
909 16. Burglary of a dwelling.;
910 17. Stalking and aggravated stalking.;
911 18. Act of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28.;
912 19. Home invasion robbery.;
913 20. Act of terrorism as defined in s. 775.30.;
914 21. Manufacturing any substances in violation of chapter
915 893.;
916 22. Attempting or conspiring to commit any such crime.;
917 23. Human trafficking.;
918 24. Trafficking in any controlled substance described in
919 s. 893.135(1)(c)4.;
920 25. Extortion in violation of s. 836.05.; and
921 26. Written threats to kill in violation of s. 836.10.
922 27. Driving under the influence in violation of s.
923 316.193(2)(b)1. or (2)(b)3.
924 28. Felony battery.
925 29. Battery by strangulation.
Page 37 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
926 30. Burglary in violation of s. 810.02(2).
927 (c) Upon motion by the state attorney, the court may order
928 pretrial detention if it finds a substantial probability, based
929 on a defendant's past and present patterns of behavior, the
930 criteria in s. 903.046, and any other relevant facts, that any
931 of the following circumstances exist:
932 1. The defendant has previously violated conditions of
933 release and that no further conditions of release are reasonably
934 likely to assure the defendant's appearance at subsequent
935 proceedings;
936 2. The defendant, with the intent to obstruct the judicial
937 process, has threatened, intimidated, or injured any victim,
938 potential witness, juror, or judicial officer, or has attempted
939 or conspired to do so, and that no condition of release will
940 reasonably prevent the obstruction of the judicial process;
941 3. The defendant is charged with trafficking in controlled
942 substances as defined by s. 893.135, that there is a substantial
943 probability that the defendant has committed the offense, and
944 that no conditions of release will reasonably assure the
945 defendant's appearance at subsequent criminal proceedings;
946 4. The defendant is charged with DUI manslaughter, as
947 defined by s. 316.193, and that there is a substantial
948 probability that the defendant committed the crime and that the
949 defendant poses a threat of harm to the community; conditions
950 that would support a finding by the court pursuant to this
Page 38 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
951 subparagraph that the defendant poses a threat of harm to the
952 community include, but are not limited to, any of the following:
953 a. The defendant has previously been convicted of any
954 crime under s. 316.193, or of any crime in any other state or
955 territory of the United States that is substantially similar to
956 any crime under s. 316.193;
957 b. The defendant was driving with a suspended driver
958 license when the charged crime was committed; or
959 c. The defendant has previously been found guilty of, or
960 has had adjudication of guilt withheld for, driving while the
961 defendant's driver license was suspended or revoked in violation
962 of s. 322.34;
963 5. The defendant poses the threat of harm to the
964 community. The court may so conclude, if it finds that the
965 defendant is presently charged with a dangerous crime, that
966 there is a substantial probability that the defendant committed
967 such crime, that the factual circumstances of the crime indicate
968 a disregard for the safety of the community, and that there are
969 no conditions of release reasonably sufficient to protect the
970 community from the risk of physical harm to persons;
971 6. The defendant was on probation, parole, or other
972 release pending completion of sentence or on pretrial release
973 for a dangerous crime at the time the current offense was
974 committed;
975 7. The defendant has violated one or more conditions of
Page 39 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
976 pretrial release or bond for the offense currently before the
977 court and the violation, in the discretion of the court,
978 supports a finding that no conditions of release can reasonably
979 protect the community from risk of physical harm to persons or
980 assure the presence of the accused at trial; or
981 8.a. The defendant has ever been sentenced pursuant to s.
982 775.082(9) or s. 775.084 as a prison releasee reoffender,
983 habitual violent felony offender, three-time violent felony
984 offender, or violent career criminal, or the state attorney
985 files a notice seeking that the defendant be sentenced pursuant
986 to s. 775.082(9) or s. 775.084, as a prison releasee reoffender,
987 habitual violent felony offender, three-time violent felony
988 offender, or violent career criminal;
989 b. There is a substantial probability that the defendant
990 committed the offense; and
991 c. There are no conditions of release that can reasonably
992 protect the community from risk of physical harm or ensure the
993 presence of the accused at trial.
994 (d) If a defendant is arrested for a dangerous crime that
995 is a capital felony, a life felony, or a felony of the first
996 degree, and the court determines there is probable cause to
997 believe the defendant committed the offense, the state attorney,
998 or the court on its own motion, must move shall motion for
999 pretrial detention unless the defendant is already being held.
1000 If the court finds a substantial probability that the defendant
Page 40 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
1001 committed the offense and, based on the defendant's past and
1002 present patterns of behavior, consideration of the criteria in
1003 s. 903.046, and any other relevant facts, that no conditions of
1004 release or bail will reasonably protect the community from risk
1005 of physical harm, ensure the presence of the defendant at trial,
1006 or assure the integrity of the judicial process, the court must
1007 order pretrial detention.
1008 Section 21. Subsection (4) of section 648.45, Florida
1009 Statutes, is amended to read:
1010 648.45 Actions against a licensee; suspension or
1011 revocation of eligibility to hold a license.—
1012 (4) A Any licensee found to have violated s. 648.44(1)(b),
1013 (e), or (j) s. 648.44(1)(b), (d), or (i) shall, at a minimum, be
1014 suspended for a period of 3 months. A greater penalty, including
1015 revocation, must shall be imposed if there is a willful or
1016 repeated violation of s. 648.44(1)(b), (e), or (j) s.
1017 648.44(1)(b), (d), or (i), or the licensee has committed other
1018 violations of this chapter.
1019 Section 22. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1020 made by this act to section 648.386, Florida Statutes, in
1021 references thereto, subsections (2) and (3) of section 626.2816,
1022 Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read:
1023 626.2816 Regulation of continuing education for licensees,
1024 course providers, instructors, school officials, and monitor
1025 groups.—
Page 41 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
1026 (2) The department shall adopt rules establishing
1027 standards for the approval, regulation, and operation of the
1028 continuing education programs and for the discipline of
1029 licensees, course providers, instructors, school officials, and
1030 monitor groups. The standards must be designed to ensure that
1031 such course providers, instructors, school officials, and
1032 monitor groups have the knowledge, competence, and integrity to
1033 fulfill the educational objectives of ss. 626.2815, 626.869,
1034 648.385, and 648.386.
1035 (3) The department shall adopt rules establishing a
1036 process by which compliance with the continuing education
1037 requirements of ss. 626.2815, 626.869, 648.385, and 648.386 can
1038 be determined, the establishment of a continuing education
1039 compliance period for licensees, and forms necessary to
1040 implement such a process.
1041 Section 23. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1042 made by this act to section 903.046, Florida Statutes, in a
1043 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section
1044 903.047, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1045 903.047 Conditions of pretrial release.—
1046 (1) As a condition of pretrial release, whether such
1047 release is by surety bail bond or recognizance bond or in some
1048 other form, the defendant must:
1049 (c) Comply with all conditions of pretrial release imposed
1050 by the court. A court must consider s. 903.046(2) when
Page 42 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
1051 determining whether to impose nonmonetary conditions in addition
1052 to or in lieu of monetary bond. Such nonmonetary conditions may
1053 include, but are not limited to, requiring a defendant to:
1054 1. Maintain employment, or, if unemployed, actively seek
1055 employment.
1056 2. Maintain or commence an educational program.
1057 3. Abide by specified restrictions on personal
1058 associations, place of residence, or travel.
1059 4. Report on a regular basis to a designated law
1060 enforcement agency, pretrial services agency, or other agency.
1061 5. Comply with a specified curfew.
1062 6. Refrain from possessing a firearm, destructive device,
1063 or other dangerous weapon.
1064 7. Refrain from excessive use of alcohol, or any use of a
1065 narcotic drug or other controlled substance without a
1066 prescription from a licensed medical practitioner.
1067 8. Undergo available medical, psychological, psychiatric,
1068 mental health, or substance abuse evaluation and follow all
1069 recommendations, including treatment for drug or alcohol
1070 dependency, and remain in a specified institution, if required
1071 for that purpose.
1072 9. Return to custody for specified hours following release
1073 for employment, school, or other limited purposes.
1074 10. Any other condition that is reasonably necessary to
1075 assure the appearance of the defendant at subsequent proceedings
Page 43 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1017 2026
1076 and to protect the community against unreasonable danger of
1077 harm.
1078 Section 24. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1079 made by this act to section 903.09, Florida Statutes, in a
1080 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 903.286, Florida
1081 Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1082 903.286 Return of cash bond; requirement to withhold
1083 unpaid fines, fees, court costs; cash bond forms.—
1084 (2) All cash bond forms used in conjunction with the
1085 requirements of s. 903.09 must prominently display a notice
1086 explaining that all funds are subject to forfeiture and
1087 withholding by the clerk of the court for the payment of costs
1088 of prosecution, costs of representation as provided by ss. 27.52
1089 and 938.29, court fees, court costs, and criminal penalties on
1090 behalf of the criminal defendant regardless of who posted the
1091 funds.
1092 Section 25. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 44 of 44
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1017-00